Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1155.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 44-5 of the General Laws entitled "Levy and Assessment of Local
Taxes" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
44-5-75.1. Glocester -- Supplemental tax.
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the town of Glocester is authorized
to levy a supplemental tax, by voter referendum, that exceeds the current tax cap of four percent
(4%) by not more than an additional three percent (3%) for fiscal year 2026, in order to fund school
department operations and to avoid loss of critical town services. For purposes of the levy
calculation required by § 44-5-2(b), supplemental taxes levied pursuant to this section shall be
included in the total amount levied and certified by the town of Glocester for fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003060
========